Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2113.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 40-464, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE40-464. Powers and duties A. The director may: 1. Research, study and analyze residential utility consumer interests. 2. Prepare and present briefs, arguments, proposed rates or orders and intervene or appear on behalf of residential utility consumers before hearing officers and the corporation commission as a party in interest and also participate as a party in interest pursuant to sections 40-254 and 40-254.01 in proceedings relating to rate making or rate design and involving public service corporations, except that the director shall not participate in any proceedings pursuant to this paragraph involving a member-owned nonprofit cooperative corporation. 3. Make and execute contracts and other instruments as necessary to perform his the director's duties. 4. Hire employees subject to title 41, chapter 4, article 4 as necessary to carry out this article and contract for special services as needed. 5. Employ such attorneys as are required to represent the interests of residential utility consumers. B. The director shall adopt administrative rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this article. C. All contacts by residential utility consumers with regard to quality or quantity of service provided by a public service corporation shall be recorded by the office for the purpose of determining general concerns of consumers.  The office may advise the consumer of other agencies that may be of further assistance and shall refer the consumer to the corporation commission utilities division consumer services section established in by section 40-110. D. The director shall intervene in a public service corporation rate case if the impact of the public service corporation's proposed rate increase to residential customers is one hundred percent or more. END_STATUTE